Maryland, session 2025, SB0952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Brownfields site” means:
(i) a former industrial or commercial site identified by federal or
State laws or regulation as contaminated or polluted;
(ii) a closed landfill regulated by the Department of the
Environment; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0952*

SENATE BILL 952
(iii) mined land.
(3) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
(4) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity;
2. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current; and
3. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid during time periods when the electric grid is out of service;
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that:
1. are used for the production of electricity from a solar
photovoltaic system or an eligible customer–generator that is subject to the provisions of §
7–306 of this title;
2. are located on the same property or adjacent properties;
3. have the capacity to produce, when calculated
cumulatively for all generating units or facilities on the property or adjacent property, more
than 2 megawatts but not more than 14 megawatts of alternating current; and
4. for each individual generating unit or facility:
A. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current;

SENATE BILL 952 3
B. is separately metered by the electric company; and
C. does not export electricity for sale on the wholesale market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection, LLC;
(iii) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of a service interruption from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the
Department of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(iv) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (iii) of this paragraph.
(5) (I) “GRID ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS
INFRASTRUCTURE, HARDWARE, OR SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY,
EFFICIENCY, RELIABILITY, OR RESILIENCE OF A NEW OR EXISTING TRANSMISSION
LINE.
(II) “GRID ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES” INCLUDES:
1. HIGH–PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS; AND
2. STORAGE USED AS TRANSMISSION.
(6) (i) “Mined land” means the surface or subsurface of an area in which
surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted.

SENATE BILL 952
(ii) “Mined land” includes:
1. private ways and roads used for mining appurtenant to
any surface mining area;
2. land excavations;
3. workings; and
4. overburden.
[(6)] (7) “Qualified generator lead line” means an overhead transmission
line that is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts and would allow an
out–of–state Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to interconnect with a portion of the electric
system in Maryland that is owned by an electric company.
(f) For the construction of an overhead transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
[and]
(ii) for construction related to a new overhead transmission line, the
alternative routes that the applicant considered, including the estimated capital and
operating costs of each alternative route and a statement of the reason why the alternative
route was rejected; AND
(III) THE USE OF GRID ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES AS AN
ALTERNATIVE TO CONSTRUCTION OF THE TRANSMISSION LINE;
(2) require as an ongoing condition of the certificate of public convenience
and necessity that an applicant comply with:
(i) all relevant agreements with PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its
successors, related to the ongoing operation and maintenance of the overhead transmission
line; and
(ii) all obligations imposed by the North America Electric Reliability
Council and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission related to the ongoing operation
and maintenance of the overhead transmission line; and
(3) require the applicant to identify whether the overhead transmission
line is proposed to be constructed on:

SENATE BILL 952 5
(i) an existing brownfields site;
(ii) property that is subject to an existing easement; or
(iii) a site where a tower structure or components of a tower structure
used to support an overhead transmission line exist.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.